fi: Mukana tulevat leikkirahasetin osat: Pankkiautomaatti; Setelit; Kortinlukija/maksupääte; Kassakone; Shekit; Kolikkotarjotin; Kolikot; Talletuskuitit; Säästöpossu; Leikkiluotto-/-pankkikortit; Leikkikassakaappi/-lipas; Lompakko/kukkaro; Muu
it: Componenti del set di denaro di gioco inclusi: Bancomat; Banconote; Lettore di carte/POS; Registratore di cassa; Assegni; Vassoio per monete; Monete; Distinte di versamento; Salvadanaio; Carte di credito/debito finte; Cassaforte/cassetta di sicurezza finta; Portafoglio/borsellino; Altro
sk-SK: Komponenty sady hry s peniazmi v cene: Bankomat; Bankovky; Čítačka kariet/terminál; Pokladňa; Šeky; Priehradka na mince; Mince; Vkladové lístky; Pokladnička; Kreditné/debetné karty na hranie; Trezor/skrinka na hranie; Peňaženka; Iné
pt-PT: Componentes incluídos no conjunto de dinheiro fictício: Caixa multibanco/bancária; Notas; Leitor/terminal de cartões; Caixa registadora; Cheques; Tabuleiro de moedas; Moedas; Talões de depósito; Mealheiro; Cartões de crédito/débito de brincar; Cofre/caixa-forte de brincar; Carteira/porta-moedas; Outro
cs: Součástí sady jsou následující komponenty: Bankomat; Bankovky; Čtečka karet / terminál; Pokladna; Šeky; Pořadač na mince; Mince; Vkladové lístky; Pokladnička; Hrací kreditní/debetní karty; Hrací trezor / bezpečnostní schránka; Peněženka/kabelka; Jiné
lt-LT: Į žaislinį pinigų rinkinį įeinantys komponentai: Bankomatas; Kupiūros / banknotai; Kortelių skaitytuvas / terminalas; Kasos aparatas; Čekiai; Monetų padėklas; Monetos; Įmokų kvitai; Taupyklė; Žaislinės kredito / debeto kortelės; Žaislinis seifas / rakinama dėžutė; Piniginė; Kita
ko: 놀이용 돈 세트 구성품 포함: ATM/현금 인출기; 지폐; 카드 리더기/단말기; 금전 등록기; 수표; 동전 트레이; 동전; 예금 전표; 저금통; 장난감 신용/체크카드; 장난감 금고/보관함; 지갑/퍼스; 기타
da: Medfølgende komponenter i legepengesæt: Hæveautomat/bankautomat; Sedler; Kortlæser/terminal; Kasseapparat; Checks; Møntbakke; Mønter; Indbetalingssedler; Sparegris; Kredit-/debetkort (legetøj); Pengeboks (legetøj); Pung; Andet
nb: Inkluderte komponenter i lekepengesett: Minibank; Sedler; Kortleser/terminal; Kassaapparat; Sjekker; Myntbrett; Mynter; Innskuddsblanketter; Sparegris; Kreditt-/debetkort for lek; Lekesafe / låsboks; Lommebok/veske; Annet
hu: Játékpénz készlet tartozék elemei: ATM/bankautomata; Bankjegyek; Kártyaolvasó/terminál; Pénztárgép; Csekkek; Aprópénztartó; Érmék; Befizetési bizonylatok; Persely; Játék hitel-/bankkártyák; Játék széf/kazetta; Pénztárca/kistáska; Egyéb
zh-TW: 包含玩具鈔票組組件: 自動櫃員機/銀行機器; 鈔票/紙鈔; 讀卡機/終端機; 收銀機; 支票; 硬幣盤; 硬幣; 存款單; 撲滿; 玩具信用卡/簽帳金融卡; 玩具保險箱/密碼箱; 錢包/皮夾; 其他
ro-RO: Componente incluse în setul de bani de jucărie: Bancomat/ATM; Bancnote; Cititor de carduri/terminal; Casă de marcat; Cecuri; Tavă pentru monede; Monede; Borderouri de depunere; Pușculiță; Carduri de credit/debit de jucărie; Seif/casetă de valori de jucărie; Portofel/poșetă; Altele
th: ส่วนประกอบของชุดเงินเล่นที่รวมอยู่ในชุด: ตู้ ATM/ตู้ธนาคาร; ธนบัตร; เครื่องอ่านบัตร/เครื่องรับชำระเงิน; เครื่องบันทึกเงินสด; เช็ค; ถาดใส่เหรียญ; เหรียญ; ใบนำฝาก; กระปุกออมสิน; บัตรเครดิต/เดบิตของเล่น; ตู้เซฟ/กล่องล็อคของเล่น; กระเป๋าสตางค์/กระเป๋าถือ; อื่นๆ
fr: Éléments compris dans le kit de jeu: Distributeur de billets; Billets; Lecteur de cartes/terminal; Caisse enregistreuse; Chèques; Plateau de pièces; Pièces de monnaie; Bordereaux de dépôt; Tirelire; Cartes de crédit/débit de jeu; Coffre-fort/boîte verrouillée de jeu; Portefeuille/porte-monnaie; Autre
pt-BR: Conjunto de dinheiro de brinquedo, componentes incluídos: Caixa eletrônico/banco automático; Cédulas/notas; Leitor/terminal de cartão; Caixa registradora; Cheques; Bandeja de moedas; Moedas; Comprovantes de depósito; Cofrinho; Cartões de crédito/débito de brinquedo; Cofre/caixa de segurança de brinquedo; Carteira/bolsa; Outro
ja: プレイお金セットコンポーネント付き: ATM/銀行ATM; 紙幣; カードリーダー/端末; キャッシュレジスター; 小切手; コイントレイ; 硬貨; 預金伝票; 貯金箱; おもちゃのクレジットカード/デビットカード; おもちゃの金庫/ロックボックス; 財布/小銭入れ; その他
es: Componentes del juego de dinero de juguete incluidos: Cajero automático; Billetes; Lector de tarjetas/terminal; Caja registradora; Cheques; Bandeja de monedas; Monedas; Boletas de depósito; Alcancía; Tarjetas de crédito/débito de juguete; Caja fuerte/caja de seguridad de juguete; Billetera/monedero; Otro
nl: Inbegrepen onderdelen speelgoedgeldset: Geldautomaat; Bankbiljetten; Kaartlezer/betaalterminal; Kassa; Cheques; Muntbakje; Munten; Stortingsbewijzen; Spaarvarken; Speelgoedcreditcards/-betaalpassen; Speelgoedkluis/-geldkistje; Portemonnee; Overig
zh-CN: 包括玩具钞票套装组件: ATM / 自动提款机; 纸币/钞票; 读卡器/终端机; 收银机; 支票; 零钱盘; 硬币; 存款单; 储蓄罐; 玩具信用卡/借记卡; 玩具保险箱/锁箱; 钱包/手提包; 其他
ru: Состав набора игрушечных денег: Игрушечный банкомат; Банкноты/купюры; Картридер/терминал; Кассовый аппарат; Чеки; Лоток для монет; Монеты; Квитанции о пополнении; Копилка; Игрушечные кредитные/дебетовые карты; Игрушечный сейф/ящик с замком; Кошелек/портмоне; Другое
pl: Elementy dołączone do zestawu pieniędzy do zabawy: Bankomat; Banknoty; Czytnik kart / terminal; Kasa; Czeki; Tacka na monety; Monety; Dowody wpłaty; Skarbonka; Zabawkowe karty kredytowe / debetowe; Zabawkowy sejf / kasetka; Portfel / portmonetka; Inne
tr: Dahil olan oyuncak para seti bileşenleri: ATM/bankamatik; Banknotlar/kağıt paralar; Kart okuyucu/terminal; Yazar kasa; Çekler; Bozuk para tepsisi; Bozuk paralar; Para yatırma fişleri; Kumbara; Oyuncak kredi/banka kartları; Oyuncak kasa/kilitli kutu; Cüzdan/el çantası; Diğer
en: Play money set components included: ATM/bank machine; Bills/notes; Card reader/terminal; Cash register; Checks; Coin tray; Coins; Deposit slips; Piggy bank; Play credit/debit cards; Play safe/lockbox; Wallet/purse; Other
sl-SI: Vključene komponente kompleta igralnega denarja: Bankomat; Bankovci; Čitalnik kartic/terminal; Blagajna; Čeki; Pladenj za kovance; Kovanci; Potrdila o pologu; Hranilnik; Igralne kreditne/debetne kartice; Igralni sef / varnostna omarica; Denarnica/torbica; Drugo
vi: Các thành phần đi kèm của bộ đồ chơi tiền giả: ATM/máy ngân hàng; Tiền giấy; Đầu đọc thẻ/máy POS; Máy tính tiền; Séc; Khay tiền xu; Tiền xu; Phiếu gửi tiền; Heo đất; Thẻ tín dụng/ghi nợ đồ chơi; Két sắt/hộp khóa đồ chơi; Ví/ví cầm tay; Khác
bg-BG: Включени компоненти в комплект игрални пари: Банкомат/банкова машина; Банкноти; Четец за карти/терминал; Терминал за плащане; Чекове; Табла за монети; Монети; Вносни бележки; Касичка; Кредитни/дебитни карти за игра; Сейф/каса за игра; Портфейл/портмоне; Други
de: Im Spielgeldset enthaltene Komponenten: Geldautomat/Bankautomat; Geldscheine; Kartenleser/Terminal; Kasse; Schecks; Münzfach; Münzen; Einzahlungsscheine; Sparschwein; Spiel-Kredit-/Debitkarten; Spieltresor/-schließfach; Geldbeutel/Portemonnaie; Sonstige
hr-HR: Uključene komponente seta igraćeg novca: Bankomat; Novčanice; Čitač kartica / terminal; Blagajna; Čekovi; Pretinac za kovanice; Kovanice; Uplatnice; Kasica prasica; Kreditne/debitne kartice za igru; Sef/kutijica za igru; Novčanik/torbica; Ostalo
el: Περιλαμβάνονται χρήματα σετ παιχνιδιού: Μηχάνημα ATM/τραπέζης; Χαρτονομίσματα; Συσκευή ανάγνωσης καρτών/τερματικό; Ταμειακή μηχανή; Επιταγές; Θήκη κερμάτων; Κέρματα; Αποδείξεις κατάθεσης; Κουμπαράς; Πιστωτικές/χρεωστικές κάρτες παιχνιδιού; Χρηματοκιβώτιο/κουτί ασφαλείας παιχνιδιού; Πορτοφόλι; Άλλο
sv: Ingående delar i leksakspengar-set: Uttagsautomat/bankomat; Sedlar; Kortläsare/terminal; Kassaapparat; Checkar; Myntfack; Mynt; Insättningskvitton; Spargris; Låtsaskredit-/betalkort; Låtsaskassaskåp/låda; Plånbok/börs; Övrigt